Utah statutes.
10-7-17.   Opening of bids -- Amount to equal or exceed appraised value and
amount of outstanding indebtedness.
At the time and place mentioned in the notice under Section 10-7-16, all bids
received by the municipal legislative body for the property sought to be sold
or leased shall be opened and considered, and the municipal legislative body
shall, subject to approval of voters at an election held under Section
10-7-15, accept the bid of the highest responsible bidder, as defined in
Section 10-7-16, if the bid price:
(1) (a)  is for an amount equal to or exceeding the appraised value of the
property to be sold, as determined under Subsection 10-7-15(1); or
(b)  in the judgment of the municipal legislative body, is an adequate price
for the  property; and
(2)  equals or exceeds the total principal and interest on any outstanding
bonds and other indebtedness issued for the purpose of constructing the works
or plant.
